Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 11 Motion Days and Terms of Court

8-11-1.
Assignment or motion day falling on holiday.

If any assignment day or any motion day occurs on a legal holiday, the assignment day or motion day shall be the following week day.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 265; G.L. 1909, ch. 285, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 335, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 504, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-11-1

.

8-11-2.
Number of sessions on motion days.

The superior court shall hold so many sessions upon motion days as may be necessary for the purpose of hearing motions for new trial and other motions and for hearing interlocutory matters in equity.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 342; G.L. 1909, ch. 290, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 340, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 504, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-11-2

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 4.

8-11-3.
Filing and notice of motions in supreme and superior courts.

All motions in the supreme or superior court shall be in writing and, except ex parte motions, shall be filed at least sixty (60) hours, exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays, before being called for hearing; and, except in ex parte motions, notice in writing shall be served upon the attorney or solicitor of record of the opposite side, or, if there is no such attorney or solicitor of record, upon the adverse party, at least forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays, before being called for hearing, unless a different time for the filing and service is fixed ex parte by a justice of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A 1905, § 343; G.L. 1909, ch. 290, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 340, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 504, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-11-3

.

8-11-4.
Docketing and calling of motions — Calendar.

All motions shall be docketed as filed, and shall be called in the order of filing, and, if not disposed of on motion day, shall be continued. A calendar shall be made up for each motion day.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 344; G.L. 1909, ch. 290, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 340, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 504, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-11-4

.

8-11-5.
Business continued by adjournment.

All writs, actions, pleas, processes, precepts, recognizances, and other things whatsoever, returnable or having day in any court, shall stand, abide, and continue unto any adjournment made according to law and be held, deemed, and adjudged to be as effectual and available in law to all intents and purposes as if the court had been held on the day appointed for holding the court and no adjournment of the court had been made.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 263; G.L. 1909, ch. 285, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 335, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 505, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-11-5

.

8-11-6.
Continuance of business when court fails to meet.

If from any cause any court in this state shall not be held at the time appointed by law, or to which it may have been adjourned, all business pending therein shall be proceeded with when the court next meets.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 264; G.L. 1909, ch. 285, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 335, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 505, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-11-6

.

8-11-7.
Postponement of hearing.

Whenever provision is made for the hearing of a matter on a day certain, it may be heard then or on some future day to which the court may assign the hearing, or on which all the parties in writing may agree and to which the court may assent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 346; G.L. 1909, ch. 290, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 340, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 505, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-11-7

.